Massachusetts, session 194th, S2316.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Definitions 
For the purposes of this Act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to 
them: 
1. "Resilient Hydroelectric Power Generation" means generating stations that: 
a. Are manufactured, installed, and operated in accordance with applicable government 
and industry standards; 
b. Are connected to the electric grid and operated in conjunction with an electric 
company's transmission and distribution system during normal operation of the electrical grid; 
c. Operate in compliance with standards and requirements established under this Act; 

of 8 10  d. Utilize a synchronous generator with black start capability, frequency control, and 
disconnect capability; 
e. Do not include the active use of fossil fuels;  
f. Have a nameplate capacity of 2.0 megawatts or less; 
g. Do not involve any dam or water diversion structure constructed after December 31, 
1997; and 
h. Must demonstrate compliance with meeting appropriate and site-specific standards that 
address adequate and healthy river flows, water quality standards, fish passage, and protection 
measures, mitigation, and enhancement opportunities in the impacted watershed by obtaining 
and maintaining a current Low Impact Hydropower Institute (LIHI) certification, provided that: 
i. If the generating station is not LIHI certified prior to its participation in the Resilient 
Electric Vehicle Charging System Pilot Program (the Program), it will submit an application for 
certification within 3 years from the date of being enrolled in the Program and its ongoing 
participation in the Program will be contingent on successfully obtaining and maintaining a LIHI 
certification, including completing any certification conditions in the time prescribed. 
2. "Resilient Electric Vehicle Charging System" means an electric vehicle (EV) 
microgrid designed to provide uninterrupted electric service for EV charging throughout an 
extended outage. 
3. "Extended Outage" means an outage of the electric distribution system that 
continues for a period of 24 hours or longer. 

of 8 30  4. "Uninterrupted" means that the Resilient Electric Vehicle Charging System 
generates electricity throughout an extended outage, except for momentary interruptions 
associated with transitions to and from grid-parallel and grid-islanded operations. 
5. "EV Microgrid" is a group of energy-generating resources with at least one source 
of Resilient Hydroelectric Power Generation and energy storage within clearly defined electrical 
boundaries that acts as a single controllable entity with respect to the grid for the purpose of EV 
charging and supporting emergency response needs during an extended outage. An EV microgrid 
can connect and disconnect from the grid to operate in both grid-connected or island-mode. 
6. “Charging Revenue” shall constitute all onsite energy sales from EV charging 
from a Resilient Electric Vehicle Charging System. 
7. “Low Impact Hydropower Institute (LIHI)” is a non-profit 501(c)(3) organization 
whose stated purpose is to reduce the impacts of hydropower generation through the certification 
of hydropower projects that have avoided or reduced their environmental impacts pursuant to the 
Low Impact Hydropower Institute's criteria. 
SECTION 2. Establishment of the Resilient Electric Vehicle Charging System Pilot 
Program 
1. Program Creation: The Department of Public Utilities (DPU) shall, within 180 
days of the enactment of this Act, promulgate rules and regulations to establish the Resilient 
Electric Vehicle Charging System Pilot Program ("the Program"). 
2. Program Components: 

of 8 50  a. Resilience Adder: Establish a net metering adder for the valuation of uninterrupted 
Resilient Hydroelectric Power Generation generated within an EV microgrid that participates in 
the Program. 
b. Timely Utility Interconnection Process: Create an expedited interconnection process 
for Resilient Hydroelectric Power Generation comprising an EV microgrid. 
c. Compliance and Operation Rules for Emergency Responders: Develop compliance 
standards, routine testing requirements, and operational protocols to ensure that EV charging 
stations are accessible and functional for emergency responders during extended outages. 
Program compliance will be developed under Section 3 and 4 of these regulations. 
d. Support for Resilient Communications: Require that EV microgrids incorporate 
infrastructure to support resilient radio communications for emergency services during normal 
operations and during extended outages. In addition, satellite or similar resilient WIFI service 
shall be installed and provided for free public use during an extended outage as available after 
emergency service providers.  
SECTION 3. River Restoration Fund  
1. Establishment: A River Restoration Fund ("the River Restoration Fund") is 
hereby established to support environmental justice initiatives, river restoration projects, and 
community education related to energy, the environment, and local industrial history. 
2. Funding Mechanism: Participants in the Program shall allocate 5% of revenues 
received from onsite EV fast charging to the River Restoration Fund. 
3. Fund Governance and Oversight:  

of 8 71  a. The independent, Massachusetts-based non-profit organization Low Impact 
Hydropower Institute (LIHI) will manage the River Restoration Fund.  
b. LIHI will create the necessary program(s) to select, award, and track funded 
projects through mechanisms that may include, but will not be limited to, grants, contracts, and 
cost-share agreements.   
c. Entities that are eligible to apply for funding from the River Restoration Fund 
include, but are not limited to: 
1. Non-profit organizations that work on environmental stewardship, river 
restoration, biodiversity conservation, environmental education, community engagement and 
outreach on social and environmental issues, and social justice issues; 
2. Community-based organizations that work on environmental stewardship, river 
restoration, biodiversity conservation, environmental education, community engagement and 
outreach on social and environmental issues, and social justice issues; 
3. Local governments; 
4. Tribes; 
5. Dam owners; 
6. Hydropower owners and operators. 
d. Eligible entities may apply for funding from the River Restoration Fund for 
projects related to, but not limited to: 

of 8 90  1. River Cleanups: Remove debris and pollutants to improve water quality and 
aquatic habitats. 
2. Climate Resilience: Enhance resilience to climate variability for local 
communities. 
3. Addressing Aging Dam Infrastructure: Fund projects that address safety and 
environmental concerns associated with aging dam infrastructure, including removal where 
appropriate.  
4. Fish Passage Improvements: Enhance or install structures that allow fish to 
navigate around dams and barriers or remove select structures with support from the structure 
owner.   
100  5. Community Outreach and Education: Fund programs that educate the public 
101 about renewable energy, environmental stewardship, and the historical significance of local 
102 industrial development. 
103  6. Environmental Justice: Fund projects and programs that provide benefits to 
104 historically marginalized communities and communities disproportionately affected by 
105 environmental degradation and lack of investment. 
106  e. Reporting requirements: 
107  1. LIHI will create, and fund recipients will adhere to, the necessary reporting 
108 requirements for projects that receive funds from the River Restoration Fund.  
109  2. Annually, LIHI will publish and submit a report on the River Restoration Fund to 
110 the DPU outlining: 

of 8 111  i. The budget and available funds; 
112  ii. A summary of projects that applied for funding; 
113  iii. A summary of projects that were selected for and awarded funding; 
114  iv. Progress report on the projects that were awarded funding; 
115  v. The outcomes and impact of projects that were awarded funds upon their 
116 completion. 
117  SECTION 4. Veterans and Emergency Responders’ Fund 
118  1. Establishment: A Veterans and Emergency Responders’ Fund ("the Veterans and 
119 Emergency Responders’ Fund") is hereby established to directly support veterans and emergency 
120 responders, recognizing their contributions during emergency/national security situations, 
121 addressing their needs, and providing support for robust emergency response. 
122  2. Funding Mechanism: Program participants shall allocate 5% of revenues received 
123 from onsite EV fast charging stations to the Veterans and Emergency Responders’ Fund. 
124  3. Fund Governance and Oversight: Any funds related generated under this section 
125 shall be distributed to the state operated Veteran’s homes on an equal basis, to their special 
126 account, up to $500,000 for each home. Any excess funds over $500,000 for each state operated 
127 Veteran’s homes shall be placed in the special trust fund subject to the control of the Secretary of 
128 Veterans Services. 
129  SECTION 5. Reporting and Accountability 

of 8 130  a. Annual Report: The DPU shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the 
131 Legislature detailing: 
132  a. The number of EV microgrids established under the Program; 
133  b. The estimated amount of energy generated and consumed; 
134  c. Financial contributions made to the River Restoration Fund and the Veterans and 
135 Emergency Responders; 
136  d. General progress update on river restoration and community projects funded based on 
137 LIHI’s annual report.  
138  SECTION 6. Effective Date 
139  This Act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.